Utah statutes.
63G-6a-303.   Duties of chief procurement officer.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the chief procurement officer serves as the central procurement officer of the state and shall:

(1)  adopt office policies governing the internal functions of the division;

(2)  procure or supervise each procurement over which the chief procurement officer has authority;

(3)  establish and maintain programs for the inspection, testing, and acceptance of each procurement item over which the chief procurement officer has authority;

(4)  prepare statistical data concerning each procurement and procurement usage of a state procurement unit;

(5)  ensure that:

(a)  before approving a procurement not covered by an existing statewide contract for information technology or telecommunications supplies or services, the chief information officer and the agency have stated in writing to the division that the needs analysis required in Section 63F-1-205 was completed, unless the procurement is approved in accordance with Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program; and

(b)  the oversight authority required by Subsection (5)(a) is not delegated outside the division; and

(6)  provide training to procurement units and to persons who do business with procurement units.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

